Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.100

Application—Contents—Filing—Qualifications of applicants and licensees—Waiver—Exceptions.

(1) Every applicant for an employment agency's license or a renewal thereof shall file with the director a written application stating the name and address of the applicant; the street and number of the building in which the business of the employment agency is to be conducted; the name of the person who is to have the general management of the office; the name under which the business of the office is to be carried on; whether or not the applicant is pecuniarily interested in the business to be carried on under the license; shall be signed by the applicant and sworn to before a notary public; and shall identify anyone holding over twenty percent interest in the agency. If the applicant is a corporation, the application shall state the names and addresses of the officers and directors of the corporation, and shall be signed and sworn to by the president and secretary thereof. If the applicant is a partnership, the application shall also state the names and addresses of all partners therein, and shall be signed and sworn to by all of them. The application shall also state whether or not the applicant is, at the time of making the application, or has at any previous time been engaged in or interested in or employed by anyone engaged in the business of an employment agency.

(2) The application shall require a certification that no officer or holder of more than twenty percent interest in the business has been convicted of a felony within ten years of the application which directly relates to the business for which the license is sought, or had any judgment entered against such person in any civil action involving fraud, misrepresentation, or conversion.

(3) All applications for employment agency licenses shall be accompanied by a copy of the form of contract and fee schedule to be used between the employment agency and the applicant.

(4) No license to operate an employment agency in this state shall be issued, transferred, renewed, or remain in effect, unless the person who has or is to have the general management of the office has qualified pursuant to this section. The director may, for good cause shown, waive the requirement imposed by this section for a period not to exceed one hundred and twenty days. Persons who have been previously licensed or who have operated to the satisfaction of the director for at least one year prior to September 21, 1977 as a general manager shall be entitled to operate for up to one year from such date before being required to qualify under this section. In order to qualify, such person shall, through testing procedures developed by the director, show that such person has a knowledge of this law, pertinent labor laws, and laws against discrimination in employment in this state and of the United States. Said examination shall be given at least once each quarter and a fee for such examination shall be established by the director. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude any one natural person from being designated as the person who is to have the general management of up to three offices operated by any one licensee.

While employment directories may at the director's discretion be required to show that the person has a knowledge of this chapter, employment directories are exempt from testing on pertinent labor laws, and laws against discrimination in employment in this state and of the United States.

(5) Employment directories shall register with the department and meet all applicable requirements of this chapter but shall not be required to be licensed by the department or pay a licensing fee.

[ 1993 c 499 s 4; 1982 c 227 s 14; 1977 ex.s. c 51 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1982 c 227: See note following RCW 19.09.100.